Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 4.1A, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: e. âGenderâ , when used alone in reference to males, females, or the natural differences between males and females , shall be considered a synonym for sex and shall not be considered a synonym or shorthand expression for gender identity, experienced gender, gender expression, or gender role. House File 2357, p. 2 Sec. 2. Section 4.1A, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4. Any state department or subunit of a department, or any political subdivision of the state including a city, county, township, or school district , that collects vital statistics for the purpose of complying with state antidiscrimination laws, or for the purpose of gathering accurate state public health, crime, economic, or other data, shall identify the sex of each person included in the collected data as either male or female. Sec. 3. Section 8.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. The initiation and preparation of a balanced budget of any and all revenues and expenditures for each regular session of the legislature general assembly . Sec. 4. Section 8.22, subsection 1, paragraph b, subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (2) If the estimated revenues of the government for the ensuing fiscal year as set forth in the budget on the basis of existing laws, plus the estimated amounts in the treasury at the close of the year in progress, available for expenditure in the ensuing fiscal year are less than the aggregate recommended for the ensuing fiscal year as contained in the budget, the governor shall make recommendations to the legislature general assembly in respect to the manner in which the deficit shall be met, whether by an increase in the state tax or the imposition of new taxes, increased rates on existing taxes, or otherwise, and if the aggregate of the estimated revenues, plus estimated balances in the treasury, is greater than the recommended appropriations for the ensuing fiscal year, the governor shall make recommendations in reference to the application of the surplus to the reduction of debt or otherwise, to the reduction in taxation, or to such other action as in the governorâs opinion is in the interest of the public welfare. Sec. 5. Section 8.57A, subsection 4, paragraphs b and c, Code 2026, are amended by striking the paragraphs. Sec. 6. Section 9F.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9F.6 Population of counties, townships , and cities. House File 2357, p. 3 Whenever the population of any county, township , or city is referred to in any law of this state, it shall be determined by the last preceding certified federal census unless otherwise provided. Whenever a special federal census is taken by any city, the mayor and council shall certify the census as soon as possible to the secretary of state and to the treasurer of state as otherwise herein provided, and upon the failure to do so, the treasurer of state shall, after six months from the date of the special census, withhold allocation from the state to the city of any moneys the amount of which is based on the population of the city, and shall continue to do so until such time as certification by the mayor and council is made, or until the next decennial federal decennial census. If there be is a difference between the original certified record in the office of the secretary of state and the published census , the former shall prevail. Sec. 7. Section 12.51, subsection 2, paragraph b, subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (a) For each fiscal year for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2030, of the total amount of the state portion of the moneys paid to the state as described in paragraph âbâ subparagraph (1) and deposited in the fund, plus any interest and earnings on moneys in the fund, seventy-five percent is appropriated to the department and twenty-five percent is appropriated to the office of the attorney general for purposes of abating the opioid crisis in this state. Sec. 8. Section 12.51, subsection 2, paragraph b, subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (4) A recipient shall receive no more than one disbursement under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (3), subparagraph division (b). Sec. 9. Section 15.274, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15.274 Promotional program for national historic landmarks and cultural and entertainment districts. The economic development authority, in cooperation with the state department of transportation, shall establish and administer a program designed to promote knowledge of House File 2357, p. 4 and access to buildings, sites, districts, structures, and objects located in this state that have been designated by the secretary of the interior of the United States as a national historic landmark, unless the national historic landmark is protected under section 22.7, subsection 20 . The program shall be designed to maximize the visibility and visitation of national historic landmarks in this state. Methods used to maximize the visibility and visitation of such locations may include the use of tourism literature, signage on highways, maps of the state and cities, and internet sites. For purposes of this section , âhighwayâ means the same as defined in section 325A.1 . Sec. 10. Section 15.436, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. The economic development authority shall, pursuant to section 15.106A, subsection 1 , paragraph âoâ , establish the arts and culture enhancement fund to be used for the purposes of this section . The fund shall consist of any moneys appropriated by the general assembly for purposes of this section and any other moneys that are lawfully available to the authority. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall accrue to the authority and shall be used for purposes of this section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to any other fund but shall remain in the fund for expenditure for subsequent fiscal years. Sec. 11. Section 16.230, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16.230 Definitions. As used in this part: 1. âDepartmentâ means the department of homeland security and emergency management. 2. âFundâ means the natural hazard mitigation revolving loan fund created in section 29D.4 . 3. âLoan recipientâ means the same as defined in section 29D.2 . 4. âProgramâ means the natural hazard mitigation financing program created in section 29D.3 . 5. âProjectâ means the same as defined in section 29D.2 . House File 2357, p. 5 Sec. 12. Section 28E.9, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. In any case or controversy involving performance or interpretation of, or liability under, the agreement, the public agencies that are party to the agreement shall be real parties in interest, and the state may maintain an action to recoup or otherwise make itself whole for any damages or liability which it may incur by reason of being joined as a party therein. Such action shall be maintainable against any public agency or agencies whose default, failure of performance, or other conduct caused or contributed to the incurring of damage or liability by the state. Sec. 13. Section 49.128, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. a. No later than twenty days following an election, the commissioner shall place on file in the commissionerâs office a certification that the county met the following requirements at the election: a. (1) The testing of voting equipment was performed, as required under section 52.35 . b. (2) The election personnel training course was conducted, as required under section 49.124 . c. (3) Polling places met accessibility standards, as required under section 49.21 . d. (4) The schedule of required publications was adhered to, as required under section 49.53 . e. (5) The commissioner has complied with administrative rules adopted by the state commissioner under chapter 52 , including having a written voting system security plan. f. b. The state commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to require that the commissioner provide and certify additional information. Sec. 14. Section 84A.1B, subsection 3, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: Create, and update as necessary, a list of high-demand jobs statewide for purposes of the future ready Iowa registered apprenticeship programs created in chapter 84F , the summer youth intern pilot program established under section 84A.12 , the Iowa employer innovation program established under section House File 2357, p. 6 84A.13 , the future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship program established under section 256.228 , the future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant program established under section 256.229 , and postsecondary summer classes for high school students as provided under section 261E.8, subsection 8 . In addition to the list created by the workforce development board under this subsection , each community college, in consultation with regional career and technical education planning partnerships, and with the approval of the board of directors of the community college, may identify and maintain a list of not more than five regional high-demand jobs in the community college region, and shall share the lists with the workforce development board. The lists submitted by community colleges under the this subsection may be used in that community college region for purposes of programs identified under this subsection . The workforce development board shall have full discretion to select and prioritize statewide high-demand jobs after consulting with business and education stakeholders, as appropriate, and seeking public comment. The workforce development board may add to the list of high-demand jobs as it deems necessary. For purposes of this subsection , âhigh-demand jobâ means a job in the state that the board, or a community college in accordance with this subsection , has identified in accordance with this subsection . In creating a list under this subsection , the following criteria, at a minimum, shall apply: Sec. 15. Section 99G.31, subsection 3, paragraph g, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: A ticket or share issued by the division shall not be purchased by and no a prize shall not be paid to any of the following: Sec. 16. Section 99G.31, subsection 3, paragraph h, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: A ticket or share issued by the division shall not be purchased by and no a prize shall not be paid to any of the following: Sec. 17. Section 123.31C, subsection 1, Code 2026, is House File 2357, p. 7 amended to read as follows: 1. A person holding a special class âCâ retail native wine license may sell beer and native wine only at retail for consumption on or off the premises. Sales of beer Beer and native wine sold for consumption off the premises made pursuant to this section shall be made sold in original containers except as provided in subsection 5 . A sale of a mixed drink or cocktail that does not contain alcoholic liquor may be sold for consumption off the premises subject to the requirements of section 123.49, subsection 2 , paragraph âdâ . Sec. 18. Section 135C.2, subsection 6, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: The department shall establish a special classification within the residential care facility category for residential care facilities which have the primary purpose of serving pediatric palliative care patients and that only provides provide respite care services and the services of a hospice program as defined in section 135J.1 . A facility within the special classification established pursuant to this subsection shall be exempt from section 135.62 . The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A which shall include but not be limited to all of the following: Sec. 19. Section 135C.2, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8. The rules adopted by the department regarding nursing facilities shall provide that a nursing facility may choose to be inspected either by the department or by the joint commission. The rules regarding acceptance of inspection by the joint commission shall include recognition, in lieu of inspection by the department, of comparable inspections and inspection findings of the joint commission, if the department is provided with copies of all requested materials relating to the inspection process. This subsection is effective upon passage of federal legislation in accordance with 1996 Iowa Acts, ch. 1053, Â§3. Sec. 20. Section 135C.6, subsection 10, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10. Notwithstanding section 135C.9 , nursing facilities which are accredited by the joint commission shall be licensed House File 2357, p. 8 without inspection by the department, if the nursing facility has chosen to be inspected by the joint commission in lieu of inspection by the department. This subsection is effective upon passage of federal legislation in accordance with 1996 Iowa Acts, ch. 1053, Â§3. Sec. 21. Section 135C.24, subsections 1, 2, and 4, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 1. No A health care facility, and no an owner, administrator, employee , or representative thereof , shall not act as guardian, trustee , or conservator for any resident of such facility, or any of such residentâs property, unless such resident is related to the person acting as guardian within the third degree of consanguinity. 2. A health care facility shall provide for the safekeeping of personal effects, funds , and other property of its residents, provided that whenever necessary for the protection of valuables or in order to avoid unreasonable responsibility therefor, the facility may require that they be excluded or removed from the premises of the facility and kept at some place not subject to the control of the facility. 4. Any funds or other property belonging to or due a resident, or expendable for the residentâs account, which are received by a health care facility shall be trust funds, shall be kept separate from the funds and property of the facility and of its other residents, or specifically credited to such resident, and shall be used or otherwise expended only for the account of the resident. Upon request the facility shall furnish the resident, the guardian, trustee , or conservator, if any, for any resident, or any governmental unit or private charitable agency contributing funds or other property on account of any resident, a complete and certified statement of all funds or other property to which this subsection applies detailing the amounts and items received, together with their sources and disposition. Sec. 22. Section 135H.5, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. An application for a license shall be accompanied by the required license fee which shall be credited to the general fund of the state. The initial application fee and the annual House File 2357, p. 9 license fee is are twenty-five dollars. Sec. 23. Section 148.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. The board, after due notice and hearing in accordance with chapter 17A , may issue an order to discipline a licensee for any of the grounds set forth in section 147.55 , chapter 272C , or this subsection section . Notwithstanding section 272C.3 , licensee discipline may include a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars. Sec. 24. Section 169.13, subsection 3, paragraph h, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: h. Demonstrating an inability to practice veterinary medicine with reasonable skill and safety by reason of illness, drunkenness, excessive use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or other type of material , or as a result of a mental or physical condition. Sec. 25. Section 187.201, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department and shall be used exclusively to administer the programs created in this subchapter III as determined and directed by the department, and shall not require further special authorization by the general assembly. Sec. 26. Section 187.331, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. A farm or business that owns or operates the farm source shall be given a preference to participate in the program if the farm or business is currently participating in the choose Iowa promotional program as provided in this part 1 of this subchapter III . Otherwise, a farm or business may participate in the program if the farm or business has applied to participate in the choose Iowa promotional program and the department determines that the application will be approved. Sec. 27. Section 189A.2, subsection 1, paragraph b, subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (4) If it bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of section 706 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; however, an article which is not otherwise deemed adulterated under subparagraph (2) , or (3) , House File 2357, p. 10 or (4) of under this paragraph subparagraph shall nevertheless be deemed adulterated if use of the pesticide chemical, food additive, or color additive in or on such article is prohibited by regulations of the secretary in official establishments. Sec. 28. Section 200.3, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5. âBrandâ means a term, design, trademark, product name, or other specific designation under which a an individual beneficial substance or commercial fertilizer is offered for sale. Sec. 29. Section 200.3, subsection 22, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22. âNuisance action or proceedingâ means an action, claim , or proceeding brought at law, in equity, or as an administrative proceeding, which is based on nuisance. Sec. 30. Section 200.6, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: e. All fertilizers distributed or stored in bulk, unless in the manufacturers manufacturerâs authorized containers, shall be labeled as the responsibility of the possessor. Sec. 31. Section 200.10, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. It shall be the duty of the The secretary, who may act through an authorized agent, to shall sample, inspect, make analysis of, and test commercial fertilizers or beneficial substances distributed within this state at time and place and to such an extent as the secretary may deem necessary, to determine whether such commercial fertilizers or beneficial substances are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter . In the performance of the foregoing duty, the secretary may consult with the director of the Iowa agricultural experimental station in respect to the time, place, and extent of sampling. The secretary acting individually or through an agent is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises or conveyances during regular business hours in order to have access to a commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance subject to the provisions of this chapter including in rules adopted by the department under this chapter . The secretary shall maintain a laboratory with House File 2357, p. 11 the necessary equipment and to employ such employees as may be necessary to assist in the administration and enforcement of this chapter . Sec. 32. Section 203.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. âBondâ means a bond issued by a surety company or an irrevocable letter of credit issued by a financial institution described in subsection 9 . Sec. 33. Section 203D.1, subsection 20, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. âSellerâ means a person who sells grain , that the person has produced or caused to be produced , to a licensed grain dealer. Sec. 34. Section 203D.6, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. A depositor filing a claim for a dollar value loss under this subsection shall be bound by the dollar value loss determined by the board. The dollar value loss is the outstanding balance on the validated claim at the time the claimant is indemnified from the fund. Sec. 35. Section 217.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 217.4 Meetings of council. Meetings shall be called by the chairperson or upon written request of any three council members as necessary to carry out the duties of the council. The chairperson shall preside at all meetings or , in the absence of the chairperson , the vice chairperson shall preside. The members of the council shall be paid a per diem as specified in section 7E.6 and their reasonable and necessary expenses. Sec. 36. Section 217.31, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. Any person may institute a civil action for damages under chapter 669 or to restrain the dissemination of confidential records set out in section 217.30, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , âcâ , or âdâ , in violation of that section, and any person, agency , or governmental body proven to have disseminated or to have requested and received confidential records in violation of section 217.30, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , âcâ , or âdâ , House File 2357, p. 12 shall be liable for actual damages and exemplary damages for each violation and shall be liable for court costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the party bringing the action. In no case shall the award for damages be less than one hundred dollars. Sec. 37. Section 225.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 225.2 Name State psychiatric hospital name ââ location. It The hospital established in section 225.1 shall be known as the state psychiatric hospital, and shall be located at Iowa City, and integrated with the university of Iowa college of medicine and university hospital of the state university of Iowa. Sec. 38. Section 225.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 225.3 Under control of state State board of regents control . The state board of regents shall have full power to manage, control, and govern the said state psychiatric hospital the same as other institutions already under its control. Sec. 39. Section 225A.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (d), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (d) Is consistent with the departmentâs agency strategic plan adopted pursuant to section 8E.206 8E.204 . Sec. 40. Section 231.4, subsection 1, paragraph i, Code 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 41. Section 232.77, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: d. Whenever the person is required to report under section 232.69 in that personâs capacity as a member of the staff of a medical or other private or public institution, agency , or facility, that person shall immediately notify the person in charge of the institution, agency, or facility or that personâs designated delegate of the need for photographs, X rays, physical assessments, or other tests. Sec. 42. Section 237.9, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: A person who receives information from or through the department shall not disclose that information directly or House File 2357, p. 13 indirectly, except as authorized by section 217.30 , or as authorized or required by section 232.69 , if the information concerns any of the following: Sec. 43. Section 237A.5, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: e. Controlled medical conditions which that would not affect the performance of the employee in the capacity employed shall not prohibit employment. Sec. 44. Section 249A.26, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7. Notwithstanding section 8.39 , the department may transfer funds appropriated for the medical assistance program to a separate account established in the departmentâs case management unit in an amount necessary to pay for expenditures required to provide case management for mental health and disabilities disability services under the medical assistance program which are jointly funded by the state and county, pending final settlement of the expenditures. Funds received by the case management unit in settlement of the expenditures shall be used to replace the transferred funds and are available for the purposes for which the funds were originally appropriated. Sec. 45. Section 252E.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. An order requiring the provision of coverage under a health benefit plan other than public coverage is authorization for enrollment of the dependent if the dependent is otherwise eligible to be enrolled. The dependentâs eligibility and enrollment for coverage under such a plan shall be governed by all applicable terms and conditions , including , but not limited to , eligibility and insurability standards. The dependent, if eligible, shall be provided the same coverage as the obligor. Sec. 46. Section 252E.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. A child is eligible for medical support for the duration of the obligorâs child support obligation. However, the childâs eligibility for coverage under a health benefit plan shall be governed by all applicable plan provisions including , but not limited to , eligibility and insurability standards. House File 2357, p. 14 Sec. 47. Section 252E.7, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4. The insurer shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, which might otherwise be incurred or imposed for actions taken in implementing this section including , but not limited to , the insurerâs release of any information, or the payment of any claims for services by the insurer, or the insurerâs acceptance of applications for enrollment of the dependent and medical expense claims for the dependent which are signed by the obligee or an employee of the department pursuant to this section . Sec. 48. Section 252E.9, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. For cases for which services are being provided pursuant to chapter 252B , the obligor shall notify the obligee and the department within ten days of a change in the terms or conditions of coverage under a health benefit plan. Such changes may include , but are not limited to , a change in deductibles, coinsurance, preadmission notification requirements, coverage for dental, optical, office visits, prescription drugs, inpatient and outpatient hospitalization, and any other changes which materially affect the coverage. Costs incurred by the obligee or the department as a result of the obligorâs failure to provide notification as required are recoverable from the obligor. Sec. 49. Section 256.11, subsection 9, paragraph d, Code 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 50. Section 256.189, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. An Iowa tuition grants fund is established in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received by the commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated to the commission for purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in accredited private institutions. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain available for expenditure House File 2357, p. 15 for purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in accredited private institutions for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of administering any scholarship or grant program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . Sec. 51. Section 256.191, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8. Fund established. An Iowa tuition grants for-profit institutions fund is established in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received by the commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated to the commission for purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in eligible institutions. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain available for expenditure for purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in eligible institutions for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of administering any scholarship or grant program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . Sec. 52. Section 256.192, subsections 8 and 9, Code 2026, are amended by striking the subsections and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 8. Each applicant, in accordance with the rules established by the commission, shall: a. Complete and file an application for a vocational-technical tuition grant. b. Be responsible for the submission of the financial information required for evaluation of the applicantâs need for a grant, on forms determined by the commission. c. Report promptly to the commission any information requested. d. Submit a new application and financial statement for House File 2357, p. 16 reevaluation of the applicantâs eligibility to receive a second-year renewal of the grant. 9. A vocational-technical tuition grants fund is established in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received by the commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated to the commission for purposes of providing vocational-technical tuition grants pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain available for expenditure for purposes of providing vocational-technical tuition grants pursuant to this section for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of administering any scholarship or grant program described in this part 4 of subchapter VII. Sec. 53. Section 256.194, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the commission for deposit in the vocational-technical tuition grants fund established in section 256.192, subsection 8 9 , the sum of one million seven hundred fifty thousand one hundred eighty-five dollars. Sec. 54. Section 256.212, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6. Fund established. An all Iowa opportunity scholarship fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated and made available to the commission to be used for scholarships for students meeting the requirements of this section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall be available for purposes of this section in subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest House File 2357, p. 17 or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . Sec. 55. Section 256.216, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: In administering the program for the community colleges and the accredited private institutions, the commission shall: Sec. 56. Section 256.218, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6. A teach Iowa scholar fund is established in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and any other moneys received by the commission for deposit in the fund, including payments collected by the commission pursuant to section 256.219, subsection 7 . The moneys in the fund are appropriated to the commission for the teach Iowa scholar program. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain available for expenditure for the teach Iowa scholar program for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . Sec. 57. Section 256.226, subsection 10, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10. Trust fund established. A rural veterinary care trust fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under the control of the commission. The commission may accept gifts, grants, bequests, and other private contributions, as well as state or federal moneys, for deposit in the fund. The commission shall remit all repayments made pursuant to this section to the rural veterinary care trust fund. All moneys deposited or paid into the trust fund are appropriated and made available to the commission to be used for meeting the requirements of this section and increasing the number of veterinarians participating in the program. Moneys in the House File 2357, p. 18 fund up to the total amount that an eligible individual may receive for an eligible loan in accordance with this section and upon fulfilling the requirements of subsection 4 , shall be considered encumbered for the duration of the agreement entered into pursuant to subsection 4 . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall be available for purposes of this section and to increase the number of veterinarians participating in the program in subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . Sec. 58. Section 256.228, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5. Fund created. A future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated and made available to the commission to be used for scholarships awarded as provided under this section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall be available for purposes of this section in subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . Sec. 59. Section 256.229, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5. Fund created. A future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated and made available to the commission to be used for grants awarded as provided under this section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general House File 2357, p. 19 fund of the state, but shall be available for purposes of this section in subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . Sec. 60. Section 256.230, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8. Fund created. An Iowa workforce grant and incentive program fund is created in the state treasury under the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated to the commission to be used for grants and incentive payments awarded as provided in this section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . Sec. 61. Section 256A.3, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 2. Establish minimum guidelines for comprehensive early child development services for at-risk three-year- three-year-old and four-year-old children. The guidelines shall reflect current research findings on the necessary components for cost-effective child development services. 3. At least biennially, develop an inventory of child development services provided to at-risk three-year- three-year-old and four-year-old children in this state and identify the number of children receiving and not receiving these services, the types of programs under which the services are received, the degree to which each program meets the councilâs minimum guidelines for a comprehensive program, and the reasons children not receiving the services are not being served. The council is not required to conduct independent research in developing the inventory, but shall determine House File 2357, p. 20 information needs necessary to provide a more complete inventory. Sec. 62. Section 256B.3, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4. To purchase and otherwise acquire special equipment, appliances , and other aids for use in special education, and to loan or lease the same under such rules and regulations as the department may prescribe. Sec. 63. Section 256B.4, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 2. The board of directors of the local school district or the area education agency shall employ qualified teachers certified by the authority provided by law as teachers for children requiring such special education. The maximum number of pupils per teacher shall be determined by the board of directors of the local school district or the area education agency board in accordance with the rules and regulations of the state board of education. 3. The board of directors of the local school district or the area education agency may establish and operate one or more special education centers to provide diagnostic, therapeutic, corrective, and other services, on a more comprehensive, expert, economical, and efficient basis than can be reasonably provided by a single school district. The services, if offered by the area education agency board, may be provided in the regular schools using personnel and equipment of the area education agency or, if it is impractical or inefficient to provide them on the premises of a regular school, the area education agency may provide services in its own facilities. To the maximum extent feasible, centers shall be established at and in conjunction with, or in close proximity to, one or more elementary and secondary schools. Local school districts or the area education agencies may accept diagnostic and evaluation studies conducted by other individuals, hospitals, or centers, if determined to be competent. Children requiring special education services may be identified in any way that the department of education determines to be reliable. Centers established pursuant to this section may contain classrooms and other educational facilities and equipment to supplement House File 2357, p. 21 instruction and other services to children with disabilities in the regular schools, and to provide separate instruction to children whose degree or type of educational disability makes it impractical or inappropriate for them to participate in classes with normal children. Sec. 64. Section 256F.3, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. To receive approval to establish an innovation zone school in accordance with this chapter , an innovation zone consortium shall submit an application to the state board which that demonstrates the support of at least fifty percent of the teachers employed at each proposed innovation zone school on the date of the submission of the application and fifty percent of the parents or guardians voting whose children are enrolled at each proposed innovation zone school, provided that a majority of the parents or guardians eligible to vote participate in the ballot process, according to procedures established by rules of the state board. Sec. 65. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, paragraph u, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: u. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 280.9A, subsection 2 , related relating to the administration of a civics test in the same manner as a school district. Sec. 66. Section 256F.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 256F.9 Procedures after revocation ââ student enrollment. If a charter school or innovation zone school contract is revoked in accordance with this chapter , a nonresident student who attended the school, and any siblings of the student , may submit an application to another school district according to section 282.18 . Applications and notices required by section 282.18 shall be processed and provided in a prompt manner. Sec. 67. Section 260I.6, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: The program is aligned with a certificate, diploma, or degree for credit , ; is either not offered for credit or is offered for short-term credit that is not eligible under the federal Pell grant program , ; and does any of the following: Sec. 68. Section 273.2, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code House File 2357, p. 22 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. In-service training programs for employees of school districts and area education agencies, provided at the time programs and services are established they do not duplicate programs and services available in that area from the universities under the state board of regents and from other universities and four-year institutions of higher education in Iowa. The in-service training programs shall include but are not limited to regular training concerning mental or emotional disorders which that may afflict children and the impact children with such disorders have upon their families. Sec. 69. Section 273.2, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7. The board of directors of an area education agency shall not establish programs and services which duplicate programs and services which that are or may be provided by the community colleges under the provisions of chapter 260C . An area education agency shall contract, whenever practicable, with other school corporations for the use of personnel, buildings, facilities, supplies, equipment, programs, and services. Sec. 70. Section 273.2, subsection 14, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14. The area education agency shall provide an annual report by January 1 of each year to the department of education, and to public schools and nonpublic schools located within the area education agencyâs boundaries which that are on the list of accredited schools pursuant to section 256.11 , a detailed description of the educational services, special education programs and services, professional development services, and media services that the area education agency provides, and the cost associated with purchasing such programs and services from the area education agency. Sec. 71. Section 273.3, subsection 14, paragraphs c and d, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: c. The board may make elective deferrals in accordance with the plan as authorized by an eligible employee for the purpose of making contributions to the investment contract on behalf of the employee. The deferrals shall be made in the manner which that will qualify contributions to the investment contract for House File 2357, p. 23 the benefits under section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 422.3 . In addition, the board may make nonelective employer contributions to the plan. d. As used in this subsection , unless the context otherwise requires, âinvestment contractâ shall mean a custodial account utilizing mutual funds or an annuity contract which that meets the requirements of section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 422.3 . Sec. 72. Section 273.3, subsection 24, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24. Be authorized to sell software and support services, professional development programs and materials, online professional development, and online training to entities other than school districts within the state and to school districts and other public agencies located outside of the state. The board may also sell to school districts within this state software and support services, professional development programs and materials, online professional development, and online training which that the area education agency is not otherwise required to provide to a school district under this chapter or chapter 256B or 257 . Sec. 73. Section 273.5, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: There shall be established a division of special education of the area education agency which that shall provide for special education programs and services to the local school districts. The division of special education shall be headed by a director of special education who meets certification standards of the department of education. The director of special education shall be an employee of the division of special education of the department of education. The director of special education shall not be an employee of the area education agency, shall not receive compensation from the area education agency, shall not supervise or manage employees of the area education agency, and shall not directly provide special education services for the agency. The director of special educationâs primary job duties and responsibilities to the area education agency are to provide oversight of the area education agencyâs special education services. The director House File 2357, p. 24 of special education shall also have the responsibility for implementation of state regulations and guidelines relating to special education programs and services. The director of special education shall have the following powers and duties: Sec. 74. Section 275.25, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. The number of directors of a school district is either five or seven as provided in section 275.12 . In school districts that include a city of fifteen thousand or more population as shown by the most recent decennial federal decennial census, the board shall consist of seven members elected in the manner provided in subsection 3 . If it becomes necessary to increase the membership of a board, two directors shall be added according to the procedure described in section 277.23 . Sec. 75. Section 282.30, subsection 1, paragraph a, subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (1) An approved or licensed juvenile shelter care home, as defined in section 232.2, subsection 40 . Sec. 76. Section 284.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. For purposes of comprehensive evaluations, standards , and criteria which that measure a beginning teacherâs performance against the Iowa teaching standards specified in subsection 1 , and the criteria for the Iowa teaching standards developed by the department in accordance with section 256.9 , to determine whether the teacherâs practice meets the requirements specified for a career teacher. These standards and criteria shall be set forth in an instrument provided by the department. The comprehensive evaluation and instrument are not subject to negotiations or grievance procedures pursuant to chapter 20 or determinations made by the board of directors under section 279.14 . Sec. 77. Section 284.6, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4. In cooperation with the teacherâs evaluator, the career teacher employed by a school district shall develop an individual teacher professional development plan. The evaluator shall consult with the teacherâs supervisor on the House File 2357, p. 25 development of the individual teacher professional development plan. The purpose of the plan is to promote individual and group professional development. The individual plan shall be based, at minimum, on the needs of the teacher, the Iowa teaching standards, and the student achievement goals of the attendance center and the school district. The individual plan shall include goals for the individual which that are beyond those required under the attendance center professional development plan developed pursuant to subsection 7 . Sec. 78. Section 284.16, subsection 1, paragraph d, subparagraph (7), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (7) Actively participate in collaborative problem solving and reflective practices which that include but are not limited to professional study groups, peer observations, grade level planning, and weekly team meetings. Sec. 79. Section 321.194, subsection 4, paragraph b, subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (3) To participate in extracurricular activities. If the licensee receives competent private instruction or independent private instruction and participates in an extracurricular activity at another school, the licensee may drive to the location of the extracurricular activity regardless of whether the licensee is enrolled at the school. Sec. 80. Section 321.194, subsection 6, paragraph c, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: c. If the applicant receives competent private instruction or independent private instruction , the certification must be made by the applicantâs primary instructor. Sec. 81. Section 359.27, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 359.27 Payment of funds. County treasurers are hereby authorized to pay over to the treasurers or clerks of cities which come under the provisions of sections 359.24 , 359.25 , and 359.26 all funds which that would otherwise be paid over to the township clerks of such townships. Sec. 82. Section 422.11F, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. The taxes imposed under this subchapter , less the credits House File 2357, p. 26 allowed under section 422.12 , shall be reduced by investment tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 15.496 and 15.508 and 15.496 . Sec. 83. Section 422.12, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: c. âPrivate instructionâ means independent private instruction as defined in section 299A.1, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , competent private instruction under section 299A.2 , or competent private instruction provided to a resident of this state by a nonlicensed person under section 299A.3 . Sec. 84. Section 422.20, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. Unless otherwise expressly permitted by section 8G.4 , section 11.41 , section 96.11, subsection 6 , section 421.17, subsections 22, 23, and 26 , section 421.17, subsection 27 , paragraph âkâ , section 421.17, subsection 31 , section 252B.9 , section 321.40, subsection 6 , sections 321.120 , 421.19 , 421.28 , 421.59 , 421.65 , 422.72 , and 452A.63 , and section 556.19, subsection 2 , this section , or another provision of law, a tax return, return information, or investigative or audit information shall not be divulged to any person or entity, other than the taxpayer, the department, or internal revenue service for use in a matter unrelated to tax administration. Sec. 85. Section 422.33, subsection 12, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced by investment tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 15.496 and 15.508 and 15.496 . Sec. 86. Section 422.60, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced by investment tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 15.496 and 15.508 and 15.496 . Sec. 87. Section 422.72, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. Unless otherwise expressly permitted by section 8G.4 , section 11.41 , section 96.11, subsection 6 , section 421.17, subsections 22, 23, and 26 , section 421.17, subsection 27 , paragraph âkâ , section 421.17, subsection 31 , section 252B.9 , House File 2357, p. 27 section 321.40, subsection 6 , sections 321.120 , 421.19 , 421.28 , 421.65 , 422.20 , and 452A.63 , and section 556.19, subsection 2 , this section , or another provision of law, a tax return, return information, or investigative or audit information shall not be divulged to any person or entity, other than the taxpayer, the department, or internal revenue service for use in a matter unrelated to tax administration. Sec. 88. Section 423.3, subsection 47A, paragraph b, subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (2) âCompetitive local exchange service providerâ means any person, including a municipal utility, that provides local exchange services, other than a local exchange carrier or a non-rate-regulated wireline provider of local exchange services under an authorized certificate of public convenience and necessity within a specific geographic area described in maps filed with and approved by the Iowa utilities comission commission as of September 30, 1992. Sec. 89. Section 423.4, subsection 8, paragraph a, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: The owner of a data center business, as defined in section 423.3, subsection 95 , paragraph âeâ âfâ , located in this state that is not eligible for the exemption under section 423.3, subsection 95 , may make an annual application to the department for the refund of fifty percent of the sales or use tax upon all of the following: Sec. 90. Section 432.12C, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. The taxes imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by investment tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 15.496 and 15.508 and 15.496 . Sec. 91. Section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph f, subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (2) âParcelâ means the same as defined in section 445.1 . âParcelâ also means that portion of a parcel assigned a classification of commercial property or industrial property pursuant to section 441.21, subsection 14 , paragraph âbâ . Sec. 92. Section 455G.32, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: House File 2357, p. 28 2. a. Notwithstanding subsection 1 , a retail dealer may install, replace, or convert any part of the gasoline infrastructure beginning at a point where the shear valve ends and continuing until the point where the dispenser breakaway ends that is incompatible with E-85 gasoline. However, beginning January 1, 2026, that part of the gasoline infrastructure must be compatible with the following: ethanol blended gasoline classified as E-40 or higher. (1) (a) Ethanol blended gasoline classified as E-15 or higher. (b) This subparagraph is repealed January 1, 2026. (2) (a) Ethanol blended gasoline classified as E-40 or higher. (b) This subparagraph shall be implemented beginning January 1, 2026. b. This subsection is repealed July 1, 2030. Sec. 93. Section 462A.9, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4. Every motorboat of class II, III , or IV shall be provided with an efficient whistle or other sound producing appliance. Sec. 94. Section 462A.9, subsection 8, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. The provisions of subsections 4, 5 , and 7 of this section shall not apply to motorboats while competing in any race conducted pursuant to section 462A.16 or, if such boats are designed and used solely for racing, while engaged in such navigation as is incidental to the tuning up of the boats and engines for the race. Sec. 95. Section 462A.9, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9. Every motorboat shall have the carburetor or carburetors of every engine therein, except outboard motors, using a liquid of a volatile nature as fuel, equipped with such efficient flame arrestor, backfire trap , or other similar device as may be prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission. Sec. 96. Section 462A.17, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. This chapter and other applicable laws of this state govern the operation, equipment, numbering , and all other House File 2357, p. 29 matters relating thereto of any vessel whenever the vessel is operated or maintained on the waters of this state under the jurisdiction of the commission, but this chapter does not prevent the adoption of any ordinance or local law relating to the operation or equipment of vessels. Such ordinances or local law are operative only so long as they are not inconsistent with this chapter or the rules adopted by the commission. Sec. 97. Section 468.106, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 468.106 Construction on or along highway. When a levee or drainage district shall have been established by the board and it shall become necessary or desirable that the levee, ditch, drain, or improvement shall be located and constructed within the limits of any public highway, it the levee, ditch, drain, or improvement shall be so built as not materially to interfere with the public travel thereon on the highway . Sec. 98. Section 468.182, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 468.182 Preference in leasing. In the event a receiver is appointed for any tract of land, the owner , if actually in possession thereof , shall have the preference to rent the same land . Sec. 99. Section 481A.57, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 481A.57 Possession and storage. A person having lawful possession of game or fur-bearing animals or their pelts lawfully taken by that person with a valid hunting or trapping license , may hold, possess, or store the game or fur-bearing animals or their pelts in an amount that does not exceed the possession limit for the game or fur-bearing animal , from the date of taking until the day before the first day of the next open season for that game or fur-bearing animal. Any person may possess up to twenty-five pounds of deer venison if the deer was obtained from a lawful source. Sec. 100. Section 493.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: House File 2357, p. 30 493.12 Applicability of statutes. 1. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter , such corporations issuing shares without par value, under the provisions hereof of this chapter , shall be and remain subject to the laws of this state , now or hereafter in force, relating to the formation, regulation, consolidation, or merger, rights, powers , and privileges of corporations organized for pecuniary profit, and all other applicable laws applicable thereto . 2. All Acts or parts of Acts providing for the incorporation, organization, administration , and management of the affairs of corporations organized for pecuniary profit and having shares of stock with a par value are hereby made applicable to corporations having shares of stock without par value, except where the same enactments are inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter . Sec. 101. Section 501B.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 501B.1 Short title. This Act chapter shall be known and may be cited as the âRevised Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Actâ . Sec. 102. Section 508E.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 508E.1 Short title. This Act chapter may be cited as the âViatical Settlements Actâ . Sec. 103. Section 514F.6, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. A health insurer shall respond to a physician physicianâs , advanced registered nurse practitioner practitionerâs , or physician assistantâs request for credentialing within fifty-six calendar days from the date of the request. Sec. 104. Section 514H.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. As used in this section , âasset disregardâ means a one dollar increase in the amount of assets an individual , who is the beneficiary of a qualified long-term care insurance policy and meets the requirements of section 514H.3 , may retain under section 249A.35 for each one dollar of benefit paid out under House File 2357, p. 31 the individualâs qualified long-term care insurance policy for qualified long-term care services. Sec. 105. Section 519A.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. The association shall submit a plan of operation to the commissioner, together with any amendments necessary or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of the association consistent with sections 519A.2 , 519A.3 , this section , and sections 519A.5 through 519A.13 . The plan of operation and any amendments thereto shall become effective only after promulgation of the plan or amendment by the commissioner as a rule pursuant to section 17A.4 , provided that the initial plan may in the discretion of the commissioner become effective immediately upon filing with the secretary of state administrative rules coordinator pursuant to section 17A.5, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a). Sec. 106. Section 533.329, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: c. The moneys and credits tax imposed under this section shall be reduced by an investment tax credit authorized pursuant to sections 15.496 and 15.508 and 15.496 . Sec. 107. Section 558A.1, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4. âLead service lineâ means a service line which that is made of lead. A galvanized service line is considered a lead service line if the line ever was or is currently downstream of any lead service line or service line of unknown material. For the purposes of this subsection , âdownstreamâ means the section of the service line between a lead service line and the water meter. Sec. 108. Section 578A.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 578A.1 Short title. This Act chapter shall be known as the âSelf-Service Storage Facilities Actâ . Sec. 109. Section 622.79, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 622.79 When party fails to obey subpoena. House File 2357, p. 32 In addition to the remedies provided in sections 622.76 through 622.78 , if a party to an action in the partyâs own right, on being duly subpoenaed, fails to appear and give testimony, the other party may, at the other partyâs election, have a continuance of the cause at the cost of the delinquent party . Sec. 110. Section 625A.19, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. When the constitutionality of an Act of the Iowa legislature general assembly is drawn into question in any appellate proceeding or further review proceeding to which the general assembly or an officer, agency, or employee thereof is not a party, the majority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and minority leader of the house of representatives shall each be permitted to file an amicus curiae brief on the constitutionality of the Act. Other members of the general assembly may sign an amicus curiae brief filed pursuant to this subsection . The form of the brief shall be as provided in rule of appellate procedure 6.906 . Sec. 111. Section 633.670, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6. If the court finds that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the conservator has committed the offense of theft against an older individual under section 714.2A , consumer fraud against an older individual under section 714.16A , elder abuse under section 726.16A 726.24 , financial exploitation of an older individual under section 726.25 , or dependent adult abuse under section 726.26 , the court shall refer the matter to the appropriate county attorney for consideration of the initiation of criminal charges. Sec. 112. Section 668.15A, subsection 3, paragraph j, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: j. Use of an electronic communication device while driving, as described in section 321.276 . Sec. 113. Section 805.8A, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: c. For violations under section 321L.2A, subsection 3 , sections section 321L.3 , section 321L.4, subsection 2 , and House File 2357, p. 33 section 321L.7 , the scheduled fine is two hundred dollars. Sec. 114. 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 27, section 4, is amended by striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: SEC. 4. Section 724.22, subsections 2, 5, and 8 , Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2. Except as provided in subsections 4 and subsection 5, a person who sells, loans, gives, or makes available a pistol or revolver or ammunition for a pistol or revolver to a person below the age of twenty-one eighteen commits a serious misdemeanor for a first offense and a class âDâ felony for second and subsequent offenses. 5. a. A parent , or guardian , or spouse who is twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, of a person under the age of twenty-one eighteen may allow the person, while under direct supervision, to possess a pistol or revolver or the ammunition therefor for any lawful purpose, or while the person receives instruction in the proper use thereof from an instructor twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, with the consent of such parent, guardian , or spouse. b. As used in this section , âdirect supervisionâ means supervision provided by the parent, guardian, spouse, or instructor who is twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, who maintains a physical presence near the supervised person conducive to hands-on instruction, who maintains visual and verbal contact at all times with the supervised person, and who is not intoxicated as provided under the conditions set out in section 321J.2, subsection 1 , or under the influence of an illegal drug. 8. A parent, guardian, or spouse , who is twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, of a minor under the age of fourteen years and who allows that minor to possess a pistol or revolver or the ammunition pursuant hereto , shall be strictly liable to an injured party for all damages resulting from the possession of the pistol or revolver or ammunition therefor by that minor. Sec. 115. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. Due to the defined term âdepartmentâ in section 260C.2 and unless the context otherwise requires, the Iowa Code editor shall replace references to the House File 2357, p. 34 âdepartment of educationâ with âdepartmentâ throughout chapter 260C . Sec. 116. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. To conform with other references throughout the Code, the Iowa Code editor is directed to replace references to âdecennial federal censusâ with âfederal decennial censusâ throughout section 423.3 . ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2357, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor